Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 5. TRANSPORTATION

SUBTITLE A. NAVIGATION DISTRICTS AND PORT AUTHORITIES

CHAPTER 5006. MATAGORDA COUNTY NAVIGATION DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 5006.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of navigation and canal commissioners of the district.

(2) "Commissioner" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Matagorda County Navigation District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 589 (S.B. 2480), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 5006.051. BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS; TERM; ELECTION. (a) The district is governed by a board consisting of five commissioners elected at large.

(b) Commissioners serve staggered six-year terms, with the terms of one or two commissioners expiring on November 30 of each even-numbered year.

(c) An election shall be held in the district every two years on the uniform election date in November to elect one or two commissioners.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 589 (S.B. 2480), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.